Utah statutes.
62A-6-101.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Informed consent" means consent that is voluntary and based on an understanding by the person to be sterilized of the nature and consequences of sterilization, the reasonably foreseeable risks and benefits of sterilization, and the available alternative methods of contraception.

(2)  "Institutionalized" means residing in the Utah State Developmental Center, the Utah State Hospital, a residential facility for persons with a disability as defined in Sections 10-9a-103 and 17-27a-103, a group home for persons with a disability, a nursing home, or a foster care home or facility.

(3)  "Sterilization" means any medical procedure, treatment, or operation rendering an individual permanently incapable of procreation.

